Oklahoma, session 2025, SB907.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 353.31 of Title 59, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section:





Req. No. 888 Page 1


1. “Central fill” means the filling of a prescription drug


order by a central fill pharmacy licensed by the State Board of


Pharmacy at the request of an originating pharmacy;


2. “Central fill pharmacy” means a licensed resident or non-


resident pharmacy facility that, upon the request of an originating


pharmacy, performs the product fulfillment of the drug order and


returns the filled prescription to the originating pharmacy for


delivery to the patient or patient’s agent or sends it directly to


the patient for non-controlled substances. A central fill pharmacy


that returns filled prescriptions to an originating pharmacy shall


not be required to obtain a wholesale distributor license; and


3. “Originating pharmacy” means a pharmacy located in this


state or out-of-state that is licensed or permitted by the state in


which it is located and, upon receipt of a prescription drug order,


requests a central fill pharmacy to perform the product fulfillment


of the order and upon receipt of the filled prescription drug order,


delivers the prescription to the patient or patient’s agent.


B. 1. An originating pharmacy may engage in product


fulfillment with a central fill pharmacy if the pharmacies:


a. have the same owner or have entered into a written


contract or agreement that outlines the services to be


provided and the responsibilities and accountabilities


of each pharmacy in compliance with federal and state


laws and regulations,

Req. No. 888 Page 2


b. share a common electronic file or have appropriate


technology to allow access to sufficient information


necessary or required to dispense or process a


prescription drug order,


c. ensure all state and federal laws regarding patient


confidentiality, network security, and use of shared


databases are followed, and


d. maintain the prescription information in a readily


retrievable manner.


2. The pharmacist-in-charge of a central fill pharmacy:


a. shall ensure that the pharmacy maintains and uses


adequate storage or shipment containers and shipping


processes to ensure drug stability and potency. Such


shipping processes shall include the use of


appropriate packaging material or devices, or both, to


ensure that the drug is maintained at an appropriate


temperature range to maintain the integrity of the


medication throughout the delivery process,


b. shall ensure that the filled prescriptions are shipped


in containers that are sealed in a manner that would


show evidence of having been opened or tampered with,


and


c. may employ auxiliary supportive personnel to assist in


non-dispensing functions such as inventory, delivery,

Req. No. 888 Page 3


receiving, or packing of completed prescription


orders.


3. Controlled substance prescriptions filled by a central fill


pharmacy shall comply with both state and federal laws and


regulations.


4. To the extent a pharmacy is acting as a central fill


pharmacy, the pharmacy shall not fill prescriptions provided


directly by a patient or an individual practitioner.


C. 1. An originating pharmacy that engages in prescription


filling by a central fill pharmacy shall, prior to the dispensing of


the prescription:


a. notify patients that their prescription may be filled


by another pharmacy, and


b. provide the name of that pharmacy or notify the


patient if the pharmacy is part of a network of


pharmacies under common ownership and that any of the


network pharmacies may fill the prescription.


2. Patient notification may be provided through a one-time


written notice to the patient or through use of a sign in the


pharmacy.


D. 1. A central fill pharmacy that delivers prescriptions


directly to a patient shall provide written information regarding


the prescription with the filled prescription.



Req. No. 888 Page 4


2. A pharmacist at the originating pharmacy shall offer the


patient or the patient’s agent information about the prescription


drug or device in accordance with Board rules.


3. This subsection shall not apply to patients in facilities


including, but not limited to, hospitals or nursing facilities,


where drugs are administered to patients by a person authorized to


do so by law.


E. The central fill pharmacy shall:


1. Place on the prescription label:


a. the name and address of the originating pharmacy which


receives the filled prescription for delivery to the


patient or the patient’s agent, and


b. in some manner indicate which pharmacy filled the


prescription;


2. Comply with all other labeling requirements of federal and


state law; and


3. Be exempt from signage requirements intended for patients.


F. A central fill policy and procedure manual shall be


maintained at both pharmacies and shall be available for inspection.


The originating and central fill pharmacies shall maintain only


those portions of the policy and procedure manual that relate to


that pharmacy’s operations. The manual shall at minimum contain:


1. An outline of the responsibilities of the central fill


pharmacy and the originating pharmacy including, but not limited to:

Req. No. 888 Page 5


a. confidentiality and integrity of patient information


procedures,


b. drug utilization review,


c. counseling responsibilities,


d. policies for operating a continuous quality


improvement program for pharmacy services designed to


objectively and systematically monitor and evaluate


the quality and appropriateness of patient care,


pursue opportunities to improve patient care, and


resolve identified problems,


e. safe delivery of prescriptions to patients,


f. requirements for storage and shipment of prescription


medication, and


g. procedures for conducting an annual review of written


policies and procedures and for documentation of this


review; and


2. Other responsibilities regarding proper handling of a


prescription and delivery to a patient or a patient’s agent pursuant


to federal and state controlled substances laws and regulations.


G. The pharmacist product verification responsibilities


provided by paragraph 2 of subsection B of this section shall be


deemed satisfied if:


1. The pharmacy establishes and follows a policy and procedure


manual that complies with subsection F of this section; or

Req. No. 888 Page 6


2. The pharmacy uses an automated system, the system is fully


automated from the time the medication is stocked into the machine


until a completed, labeled, and sealed prescription is produced by


the system that is ready for dispensing to the patient. No manual


intervention with the medication may occur after the medication is


stocked into the system. For purposes of this paragraph, manual


intervention shall not include preparing a finished prescription for


mailing, delivery, or storage.


H. 1. Records may be maintained in an alternative data


retention system including, but not limited to, a data processing


system or direct imaging system, if:


a. the records maintained in the alternative system


contain all of the information required on the manual


record, and


b. the data processing system is capable of producing a


hard copy of the record upon the request of the Board,


its representative, or other authorized local, state,


or federal law enforcement or regulatory agency.


2. Each pharmacy shall maintain records in accordance with


federal and state laws and regulations and shall be able to produce


records as requested by the Board.


3. The originating pharmacy records shall include the date the


request for filling was transmitted to the central fill pharmacy.


4. The central fill pharmacy records shall include:

Req. No. 888 Page 7


a. the date the filled prescription was mailed or


delivered by the central fill pharmacy to the


originating pharmacy, and


b. if mailed or delivered to a patient, the name and


address to which the filled prescription was shipped.


I. A central fill pharmacy shall complete a pharmacy permit


application provided by the Board and shall:


1. Provide the name of the owner, permit holder, and


pharmacist-in-charge of the pharmacy for service of process; and


2. Pay the required fee as set by the Board through rule.


The Board shall develop and implement a central fill permit and


application under the authority granted by Section 353.18 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 353.32 of Title 59, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. A pharmacy may engage in shared services with another


pharmacy in accordance with this section and rules promulgated by


the State Board of Pharmacy including data entry, interpretation of


a prescription or drug order, data entry verification, drug


utilization review, product verification, centralized fulfillment


under Section 1 of this act, or, when necessary, therapeutic


intervention.



Req. No. 888 Page 8


B. Before participating in shared services, a pharmacy shall


have a current Board issued resident or non-resident retail pharmacy


license.


C. A pharmacy may provide or utilize shared services functions


only if the pharmacies involved:


1. Either:


a. have the same owner, or


b. have a written contract or agreement that outlines the


services provided and the shared responsibilities of


each party in complying with federal and state


pharmacy laws and rules; and


2. Share a common electronic file or technology that allows


access to information necessary or required to perform shared


services in conformance with the Oklahoma Pharmacy Act and rules of


the Board.


D. A licensed retail pharmacy engaged in shared services shall:


1. Maintain manual or electronic records that identify,


individually for each order processed, the name, initials, or


identification code of each pharmacist, intern, and pharmacy


technician who took part, as authorized by rules of the Board, in


the data entry, prescription or order interpretation, data entry


verification, drug utilization review, product verification,


centralized fulfillment, or necessary therapeutic intervention


performed at that pharmacy;

Req. No. 888 Page 9


2. Report to the Board as soon as practical the results of any


disciplinary action taken by another state’s pharmacy regulatory


agency involving shared services;


3. Provide adequate security to protect the confidentiality and


integrity of patient information; and


4. Provide access for inspection of any required record or


information of any request by the Board or its designee.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-888 DC 1/19/2025 5:45:43 AM





























Req. No. 888 Page 10